Hawaii statutes.
§103-5 Emergency expenditures from general
appropriations. No expenditure shall be made under any general
appropriation for emergencies except for urgent causes arising when the
legislature is not in session, or without the approval of the governor. [L 1909,
c 62, §6; RL 1925, §1482; RL 1935, §112; RL 1945, §369; RL 1955, §9-4; HRS
§103-5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next